Florida, session 2026, SB116.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 46 47 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 48 415.1034, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 49 415.1034âMandatory reporting of abuse, neglect, or 50 exploitation of vulnerable adults; mandatory reports of death.â 51 (1)âMANDATORY REPORTING.â 52 (a)âA Any person, including, but not limited to, a any: 53 1.âPhysician, osteopathic physician, medical examiner, 54 chiropractic physician, nurse, paramedic, emergency medical 55 technician, or hospital personnel engaged in the admission, 56 examination, care, or treatment of vulnerable adults; 57 2.âHealth professional or mental health professional other 58 than one listed in subparagraph 1.; 59 3.âPractitioner who relies solely on spiritual means for 60 healing; 61 4.âNursing home staff; assisted living facility staff; 62 adult day care center staff; adult family-care home staff; 63 social worker; or other professional adult care, residential, or 64 institutional staff; 65 5.âState, county, or municipal criminal justice employee or 66 law enforcement officer; 67 6.âEmployee of the Department of Business and Professional 68 Regulation conducting inspections of public lodging 69 establishments under s. 509.032; 70 7.âFlorida advocacy council or Disability Rights Florida 71 member or a representative of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman 72 Program; 73 8.âBank, savings and loan, or credit union officer, 74 trustee, or employee; or 75 9.âDealer, investment adviser, or associated person under 76 chapter 517; or 77 10.âClerk of the court, 78 79 who knows, or has reasonable cause to suspect, that a vulnerable 80 adult has been or is being abused, neglected, or exploited must 81 immediately report such knowledge or suspicion to the central 82 abuse hotline. 83 Section 2.âSection 415.1104, Florida Statutes, is created 84 to read: 85 415.1104âTitle fraud prevention for specified adults.â 86 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 87 (a)ââClerkâ means any of the clerks of the circuit courts 88 of this state. 89 (b)ââIndependent witnessâ means a natural person who 90 physically witnesses the signing of a deed or other instrument 91 purporting to convey real property or an interest therein, and 92 who: 93 1.âIs 18 years of age or older; 94 2.âIs of sound mind; 95 3.âIs not a party to the conveyance; and 96 4.âHas no financial interest in the conveyance. 97 (c)ââNot-for-profit legal aid organizationâ means a not 98 for-profit organization operated in this state which provides as 99 its primary purpose civil legal services without charge to 100 eligible clients in its judicial circuit. 101 (d)ââSpecified adultâ means a natural person 65 years of 102 age or older, or a vulnerable adult as defined in s. 415.102. 103 (e)ââTrusted personâ means a natural person 18 years of age 104 or older whom the specified adult has expressly identified and 105 recorded with the clerk as a person who may be contacted about 106 any deed or other instrument purporting to convey real property 107 or an interest therein. 108 (2)âAny deed or instrument purporting to convey real 109 property or an interest therein from a specified adult must be 110 executed in the presence of two independent witnesses. 111 (3)âAny deed or instrument described in subsection (2) 112 which is presented to the clerk may not be recorded until after 113 a 72-hour cooling-off period has elapsed. 114 (4)(a)âA specified adult may file with the clerk the name, 115 address, telephone number, and e-mail address of a trusted 116 person. 117 (b)âThe clerk shall contact the trusted person before the 118 72-hour cooling-off period elapses. 119 (c)âThe trusted person may object to the deed or instrument 120 described in subsection (2) being recorded. An objection made by 121 the trusted person must be in writing. 122 (d)âAn objection from the trusted person triggers another 123 72-hour cooling-off period, during which time the clerk shall 124 refer the matter to a not-for-profit legal aid organization to 125 investigate whether the deed or instrument described in 126 subsection (2) was obtained through fraudulent or exploitative 127 means. 128 (e)âThe not-for-profit legal aid organization may request 129 additional time to investigate the matter. The clerk may not 130 record the deed or instrument described in subsection (2) until 131 the not-for-profit legal aid organization makes a finding that 132 the deed or instrument was not obtained through fraudulent or 133 exploitative means. 134 (5)âIf, after the cooling-off periods described in 135 subsections (3) and (4) have elapsed and there is no suspicion 136 that the deed or instrument has been obtained through fraudulent 137 or exploitative means, the clerk must record the deed or 138 instrument described in subsection (2). 139 (6)âNotwithstanding the cooling-off periods described in 140 subsections (3) and (4), if the clerk or the not-for-profit 141 legal aid organization suspects the deed or instrument described 142 in subsection (2) was obtained through fraudulent or 143 exploitative means, it must refer the matter to the state 144 attorney for further investigation and prosecution. 145 (7)âBy October 1, 2027, the clerks shall provide materials 146 in their respective offices which contain information written in 147 plain language on the risks of conveying real property or an 148 interest therein to another person, with an emphasis on 149 protecting specified adults against fraud and exploitation. 150 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 151 made by this act to section 415.1034, Florida Statutes, in a 152 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 415.1105, Florida 153 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 154 415.1105âTraining programs.â 155 (2)âWithin available resources, the department shall 156 cooperate with other appropriate agencies in developing and 157 providing preservice and inservice training programs for those 158 persons specified in s. 415.1034(1)(a). 159 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.